Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.400.315

Employment contracts.

Employment contracts entered into between an employer and a superintendent, or administrator as defined in RCW 28A.405.230, under RCW 28A.400.010, 28A.400.300, or 28A.405.210:

(1) Shall end no later than June 30th of the calendar year that the contract expires except that , a contract entered into after June 30th of a given year may expire during that same calendar year; and

(2) Shall not be revised or entered into retroactively.

[ 1990 c 8 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—1990 c 8: See note following RCW 41.50.065.